Utah statutes.
31A-23a-206.   Special requirements for variable contracts line of
authority.
(1)  Before applying for a variable contracts line of authority, a producer or
consultant shall be licensed under Section 61-1-3 as a:
(a)  broker-dealer; or
(b)  agent.
(2) A producer's or consultant's variable contracts line of authority is
revoked on the day the producer's or consultant's license under Section 61-1-3
is no longer valid.
